Maryland, session 2026, HB0090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
6–202.1.
The Mayor and City Council of Baltimore City or the governing body of a county may
establish, by law, a subclass of real property consisting of:
(1) vacant lots or improved property cited as vacant and unfit for habitation
or other authorized use on a housing or building violation notice; OR
(2) ALL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS ASSIGNED THE FOLLOWING LAND
USE CODES, AS DEFINED BY THE MARYLAND ASSESSMENT PROCEDURE MANUAL:
(I) COMMERCIAL;
(II) INDUSTRIAL;
(III) COMMERCIAL/INDUSTRIAL CONDOMINIUM;
(IV) RESIDENTIAL/COMMERCIAL; AND
(V) COMMERCIAL/RESIDENTIAL.
6–302.
(b) (1) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this
section and §§ 6–305 and 6–306 of this subtitle:
(i) there shall be a single county property tax rate for all real
property subject to county property tax except for operating real property described in §
8–109(c) of this article; and
(ii) the county tax rate applicable to personal property and the
operating real property described in § 8–109(c) of this article shall be no more than 2.5
times the rate for real property.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not affect a special rate prevailing
in a taxing district or part of a county.

HOUSE BILL 90 3
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING BODY OF A
COUNTY MAY SET A SINGLE SPECIAL RATE FOR ALL REAL PROPERTY THAT IS
ASSIGNED THE FOLLOWING LAND USE CODES, AS DEFINED BY THE MARYLAND
ASSESSMENT PROCEDURE MANUAL:
(I) COMMERCIAL;
(II) INDUSTRIAL;
(III) COMMERCIAL/INDUSTRIAL CONDOMINIUM;
(IV) RESIDENTIAL/COMMERCIAL; AND
(V) COMMERCIAL/RESIDENTIAL.
(2) A SPECIAL RATE SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE IMPOSED ONLY:
(I) WITHIN A SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICT ESTABLISHED FOR THE
PURPOSE OF FINANCING THE COST OF STATE OR COUNTY TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENTS UNDER TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE; OR
(II) ON A COUNTYWIDE BASIS FOR THE PURPOSE OF FUNDING
THE APPROVED BUDGET OF THE COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION.
(3) A SPECIAL RATE SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL BE IN ADDITION TO THE GENERAL REAL PROPERTY
TAX RATE SET UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) MAY NOT EXCEED A COMBINED TOTAL OF 12.5 CENTS FOR
EACH $100 OF ASSESSED VALUE FOR BOTH OF THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) MAY NOT APPLY TO THE RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A
MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT RECEIVES EITHER AN EXEMPTION FROM THE SPECIAL
RATE UNDER § 7–402 OF THIS ARTICLE OR A CREDIT AGAINST THE SPECIAL RATE
UNDER § 9–112 OF THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 90
(F) IF A COUNTY SETS A SPECIAL PROPERTY TAX RATE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OR (E) OF THIS SECTION, IT SHALL PROMPTLY SEND A NOTICE TO THE
DEPARTMENT THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF THE RATE; AND
(2) THE CLASS OF PROPERTY TO WHICH THE RATE APPLIES.
7–402.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MIXED–USE PROPERTY” MEANS A PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES
BOTH:
(I) A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL USE; AND
(II) A RESIDENTIAL USE.
(3) “PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS” INCLUDES:
(I) VALUATION RECORDS OF THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) COUNTY RECORDS, INCLUDING LICENSE OR PERMIT
RECORDS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER RECORD FROM A GOVERNMENTAL OR PRIVATE
SOURCE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO A COUNTY AND PROVIDES RELIABLE INFORMATION
ON THE USE OF PROPERTY.
(B) IF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SETS A SPECIAL RATE UNDER § 6–302(E) OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE COUNTY SHALL, BY LAW, GRANT EITHER:
(1) A CREDIT AGAINST THE SPECIAL RATE FOR THE ENTIRE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–112
OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) AN EXEMPTION FROM THE SPECIAL RATE FOR THE ENTIRE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 90 5
(C) A COUNTY MAY CALCULATE THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AS A PERCENTAGE OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY’S SPECIAL TAX
LIABILITY THAT IS EQUAL TO THE PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL SQUARE FOOTAGE
OF THE PROPERTY THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(2) AS A PERCENTAGE OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY’S SPECIAL TAX
LIABILITY THAT IS EQUAL TO THE PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL INCOME PRODUCED
BY THE PROPERTY THAT IS DERIVED FROM RESIDENTIAL USE; OR
(3) USING ANY OTHER REASONABLE METHOD THAT ENSURES THE
ENTIRE RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE.
(D) THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION CONTINUES FOR AS LONG AS THE
SPECIAL RATE IS IN EFFECT.
(E) A COUNTY SHALL AUTOMATICALLY GRANT THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS
SECTION WITHOUT REQUIRING AN APPLICATION FROM THE PROPERTY OWNER IF,
BASED ON PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS, THE COUNTY IS ABLE TO:
(1) IDENTIFY A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE; AND
(2) CALCULATE THE EXEMPTION DUE FOR THE RESIDENTIAL
PORTION OF THAT MIXED–USE PROPERTY.
(F) (1) IF, BASED ON PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS, A COUNTY IS ABLE
TO IDENTIFY A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE SPECIAL RATE BUT
HAS INSUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CALCULATE THE EXEMPTION DUE FOR THE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF THAT MIXED–USE PROPERTY, THE COUNTY MAY REQUEST
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE OWNER OF THE MIXED–USE PROPERTY TO
ENABLE THE COUNTY TO CALCULATE THE EXEMPTION DUE.
(2) IF AN OWNER OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY DOES NOT PROVIDE
THE INFORMATION REQUESTED TO CALCULATE THE EXEMPTION DUE, THE COUNTY
IS NOT REQUIRED TO GRANT THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION TO THAT
MIXED–USE PROPERTY.
(G) A COUNTY SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER
THIS SECTION FROM AN OWNER OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS NOT
AUTOMATICALLY GRANTED AN EXEMPTION UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 90
(H) (1) A COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE EXEMPTION
UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE OWNER OF EACH PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE AND IS NOT AUTOMATICALLY GRANTED AN EXEMPTION UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION;
AND
(II) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO APPLY FOR THE EXEMPTION.
(I) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
(1) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND
UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE EXEMPTION; AND
(2) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE
EXEMPTION UNDER THIS SECTION.
9–112.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MIXED–USE PROPERTY” MEANS A PROPERTY THAT INCLUDES
BOTH:
(I) A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL USE; AND
(II) A RESIDENTIAL USE.
(3) “PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS” INCLUDES:
(I) VALUATION RECORDS OF THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) COUNTY RECORDS, INCLUDING LICENSE OR PERMIT
RECORDS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER RECORD FROM A GOVERNMENTAL OR A
PRIVATE SOURCE THAT IS ACCESSIBLE TO A COUNTY AND PROVIDES RELIABLE
INFORMATION ON THE USE OF PROPERTY.

HOUSE BILL 90 7
(B) IF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SETS A SPECIAL RATE UNDER § 6–302(E) OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE COUNTY SHALL, BY LAW, GRANT EITHER:
(1) AN EXEMPTION FROM THE SPECIAL RATE FOR THE ENTIRE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–402
OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) A CREDIT AGAINST THE SPECIAL RATE FOR THE ENTIRE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(C) A COUNTY MAY CALCULATE THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) AS A PERCENTAGE OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY’S SPECIAL TAX
LIABILITY THAT IS EQUAL TO THE PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL SQUARE FOOTAGE
OF THE PROPERTY THAT IS USED FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES;
(2) AS A PERCENTAGE OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY’S SPECIAL TAX
LIABILITY THAT IS EQUAL TO THE PERCENTAGE OF THE TOTAL INCOME PRODUCED
BY THE PROPERTY THAT IS DERIVED FROM RESIDENTIAL USE; OR
(3) USING ANY OTHER REASONABLE METHOD THAT ENSURES THE
ENTIRE RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE.
(D) THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION CONTINUES FOR AS LONG AS THE
SPECIAL RATE IS IN EFFECT.
(E) A COUNTY SHALL AUTOMATICALLY GRANT THE CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION WITHOUT REQUIRING AN APPLICATION FROM THE PROPERTY OWNER IF,
BASED ON PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS, THE COUNTY IS ABLE TO:
(1) IDENTIFY A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE; AND
(2) CALCULATE THE CREDIT DUE FOR THE RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF
THAT MIXED–USE PROPERTY.
(F) (1) IF, BASED ON PUBLICLY AVAILABLE RECORDS, A COUNTY IS ABLE
TO IDENTIFY A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE SPECIAL RATE BUT
HAS INSUFFICIENT INFORMATION TO CALCULATE THE CREDIT DUE FOR THE
RESIDENTIAL PORTION OF THAT MIXED–USE PROPERTY, THE COUNTY MAY REQUEST

HOUSE BILL 90
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE OWNER OF THE MIXED–USE PROPERTY TO
ENABLE THE COUNTY TO CALCULATE THE CREDIT DUE.
(2) IF AN OWNER OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY DOES NOT PROVIDE
THE INFORMATION REQUESTED TO CALCULATE THE CREDIT DUE, THE COUNTY IS
NOT REQUIRED TO GRANT THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION TO THAT MIXED–USE
PROPERTY.
(G) A COUNTY SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR THE CREDIT UNDER THIS
SECTION FROM AN OWNER OF A MIXED–USE PROPERTY THAT IS NOT
AUTOMATICALLY GRANTED A CREDIT UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) A COUNTY SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE CREDIT
UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE OWNER OF EACH PROPERTY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
SPECIAL RATE AND IS NOT AUTOMATICALLY GRANTED A CREDIT UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE NOTICE SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(II) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW TO APPLY FOR THE CREDIT.
(I) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:
(1) REGULATIONS AND PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND
UNIFORM PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE CREDIT; AND
(2) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE CREDIT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
9–276.
(A) IF THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY SETS A SPECIAL RATE UNDER § 6–302(E) OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY LAW, A PROPERTY TAX CREDIT AGAINST THE
SPECIAL RATE IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY OWNED OR LEASED BY A BUSINESS
THAT EMPLOYS 15 OR FEWER EMPLOYEES.
(B) THE MAYOR AND CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
GOVERNING BODY OF A COUNTY MAY PROVIDE, BY LAW, FOR:

HOUSE BILL 90 9
(1) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT;
(2) ADDITIONAL ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT;
(3) PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND UNIFORM PROCESSING
OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(4) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE TAX
CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.